Tennessee, session 114, SB0705.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-50-1001(b)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting the following:
(2) Subject to Section 2, determine the salary and terms of employment for
employees of state special schools;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-50-1001, is amended by adding
the following as a new, appropriately designated subsection:
(1) In managing and controlling the state special schools, the department of
education must provide the following to the teachers of state special schools:
(A) Eligibility to accumulate and use leave in the same manner as public
school teachers under chapter 5, part 7 of this title; and
(B) Eligibility for paid family leave in accordance with § 8-50-814.
(2) As used in this subsection ( ), "teacher":
(A) Means a person licensed by the state board of education and
employed at a state special school; and
(B) Does not include:
(i) The chief administrative officer of a state special school; and
(ii) Those who are considered state employees for leave
purposes under title 8, chapter 50, part 8.
SB0705
002075
- 1 -

SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-50-1003, is amended by adding
the following new subsections:
(e) Any percentage increase to the salary schedule of an LEA where a state
special school is located must also result in an equivalent percentage increase to the
salary schedule for that state special school.
(f) When the general assembly appropriates monies in the budget for salaries,
raises, bonuses, or other incentives for public school teachers and other licensed
personnel employed in an LEA or public charter school in this state, the department of
education shall also obligate and expend appropriations in an equivalent amount for
salaries, raises, bonuses, or other incentives for the teachers and other licensed
personnel employed in the state special schools managed and controlled by the
department of education. It is the legislative intent that the general assembly will
appropriate monies in a sufficient amount to effectuate this subsection (f). The state is
not prohibited from providing the teachers and other licensed personnel employed in the
state special schools more than what is required by this part.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter.
- 2 - 002075